Florida, session 2026, HB371.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 1003.44, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.44 Patriotic programs; rules.—
(4) Each district school board shall adopt rules to
require:, in all of the schools of the district and in each
building used by the district school board,
(a) The display of the state motto, "In God We Trust,"
designated under s. 15.0301, in a conspicuous place at each
public school in the district and in each building used by the
district school board.
(b) Subject to legislative appropriation, the display of
portraits of George Washington and Abraham Lincoln in a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb371-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 371 2026
conspicuous place at each public school in the district. The
Department of Education shall select the portraits and make them
available to each school district.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb371-01-c1